Nebraska, session 109, LB252.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB252 LB252
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 68-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-901 Sections 68-901 to 68-9,111 and section 2 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Medical Assistance Act.
Sec. 2. (1) In establishing and maintaining the formulary and
preferred drug list, the Department of Health and Human Services shall
ensure that no non-opioid drug approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration for the treatment or management of pain shall be
disadvantaged or discouraged with respect to medicaid coverage for any
opioid or narcotic drug for the treatment or management of pain on such
formulary and preferred drug list. For purposes of this section,
impermissible disadvantaging or discouragement includes, but is not
limited to, (a) designating a non-opioid drug as a nonpreferred drug if
an opioid or narcotic drug is designated as a preferred drug or (b)
establishing more restrictive or more extensive utilization controls,
including, but not limited to, more restrictive or more extensive prior
authorization or step therapy requirements, for a non-opioid drug than
the least restrictive or extensive utilization controls for an opioid or
narcotic drug. Nothing in this section shall preclude one opioid drug
from being preferred over another opioid drug or one non-opioid drug from
being preferred over another non-opioid drug.
(2) This section shall apply to a non-opioid drug immediately upon
approval by the federal Food and Drug Administration for the treatment or
management of pain, regardless of whether such drug has been reviewed by
the department for inclusion on the formulary and preferred drug list.
This section also applies to drugs being provided under a contract
between the department and any managed care organization.
Sec. 3. (1) In establishing and maintaining its formulary, any
commercial insurance policy, certificate, or contract, delivered, issued
for delivery, or renewed in this state, or any self-funded employee
benefit plan, to the extent not preempted by federal law, shall ensure
-2-

LB252 LB252
2025 2025
that no non-opioid drug approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration for the treatment or management of pain shall be
disadvantaged or discouraged, with respect to coverage or cost sharing,
for an opioid or narcotic drug for the treatment or management of pain on
such formulary. For purposes of this section, impermissible
disadvantaging or discouragement includes, but is not limited to, (a)
imposing more restrictive coverage criteria on a non-opioid drug than the
least restrictive coverage criteria imposed on an opioid or narcotic
drug, (b) establishing more restrictive or more extensive utilization
controls, including, but not limited to, more restrictive or more
extensive prior authorization or step therapy requirements, for a non-
opioid drug than the least restrictive or extensive utilization controls
applicable to an opioid or narcotic drug, or (c) if such commercial
insurance policy, certificate, or contract, delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed in this state, or any self-funded employee benefit
plan, to the extent not preempted by federal law, maintains a formulary
grouped into tiers for the purposes of determining cost-sharing, placing
a non-opioid drug on a tier that requires a cost-sharing responsibility
that exceeds the lowest cost-sharing responsibility required for an
opioid or narcotic drug on such formulary.
(2) This section shall apply to a non-opioid drug immediately upon
its approval by the federal Food and Drug Administration for the
treatment or management of pain.
(3) If any commercial insurance policy, certificate, or contract,
delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state, or any self-
funded employee benefit plan, to the extent not preempted by federal law,
restricts coverage of a non-opioid prescription drug for the treatment or
management of pain, including through utilization management policies
such as prior authorization or step therapy, the prescribing health care
provider shall be granted an exception to such restriction if the
prescribing health care provider confirms that, based on the provider's
-3-

LB252 LB252
2025 2025
professional judgment, the non-opioid prescription drug is appropriate
for the treatment of the patient.
Sec. 4. (1) Nebraska has acted proactively to combat opioid
addiction and overdose deaths from opioids; however, work remains to be
done to decrease and prevent opioid addiction. Patients, especially those
with risk factors for opioid misuse, addiction, and overdose, should have
equal access to non-opioid drugs and prescribers should not be prevented
from prescribing either a non-opioid or opioid drug.
(2) Formulary placement and utilization management barriers are used
to limit prescribers and patients from accessing pain management
treatment alternatives. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to
ensure prescribers and patients have the necessary tools available to
comprehensively approach pain management by equalizing access between
non-opioid and opioid prescriptions and preventing systems that
disadvantage non-opioid pain management prescription drugs.
Sec. 5. Original section 68-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-4-